Oklahoma, session 2026, SB384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 286, O.S.L.

2022 (26 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 14-115.12), is amended to read as

follows:

Section 14-115.12. A. 1. A registered voter who swears or

affirms that the voter is physically unable to vote in person at the

voter’s precinct on the day of the election because the voter is a

blind person and who provides documentation from a licensed

physician confirming that the voter is a blind person, as defined by

Section 72 of Title 7 of the Oklahoma Statutes, may request that an

accessible absentee ballot be delivered to the voter electronically

in a manner prescribed by the Secretary of the State Election Board.

Req. No. 1578 Page 1

A sy stem for electronic delivery of absentee ballots to voters who

are blind persons may include the same or similar requirements as

the electronic delivery system authorized for uniformed services

voters as set forth in Section 14-118 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma

Statutes this title.

2. An accessible absentee voting packet for voters who are

blind persons, which shall include all necessary materials except

the absentee ballot, shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the

State Election Board. The accessible absentee voting packet may be

delivered to the voter by United States mail or electronically.

B. 1. The electronic delivery system may provide the voter the

opportunity to use the voter’s personal computer to mark an

accessible absentee ballot privately and independently and then

print the marked ballot.

2. The absentee ballot shall be accompanied by an absentee

ballot affidavit, which shall be executed in the same manner as

provided for affidavits in Section 14-113.2 of Title 26 of the

Oklahoma Statutes this title.

3. The voter shall return the absentee ballot and executed

affidavit to the secretary of the county election board in the same

manner provided in Section 14-113.2 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma

Statutes this title. Nothing in this section shall allow for an

absentee ballot to be returned to the county election board



Req. No. 1578 Page 2

elec tronically, and no absentee ballot returned electronically shall

be eligible to be counted by a county election board.

C. A registered voter who is a blind person, as defined by

Section 72 of Title 7 of the Oklahoma Statutes, may choose to

request the assistance of another person to complete any

requirements of this section, as provided in Section 7-123.3 of

Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.

D. Upon return of an absentee ballot described in this section,

the secretary of the county election board shall cause it to be

processed in the same manner as prescribed by law for other absentee

ballots.

E. Any person who is not qualified for the electronic delivery

of an absentee ballot as provided in this section, but who applies

for an absentee ballot described in this section, shall be deemed

guilty of a felony as provided in Section 16-102.2 of Title 26 of

the Oklahoma Statutes this title.

F. The Secretary of the State Election Board may promulgate

rules or procedures to implement the requirements of this section.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.



60-1-1578 TEK 1/14/2025 3:50:49 PM







Req. No. 1578 Page 3